Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB512.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 8504(a) of Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 8504. Amounts of assistance.(a) Maximum amount.--In no event shall veterans' temporary assistance payments exceed [the established maximum assistance or the documented amount of need, whichever is less.] $2,500 or the documented amount of need, whichever is less . * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.1234567891011121314